Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3984.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62A.59, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Algorithm and artificial intelligence use prohibited. new text end new text begin A health carrier is prohibited from using an algorithm or artificial intelligence program when making a determination to approve or deny a prior authorization request. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, and applies to health plans offered, sold, issued, or renewed on or after that date. new text end